Wyoming, session 2026, SF0090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-111(a)(ii) is amended to read:
21-3-111. Powers of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
within the state may:
(ii) Acquire, hold, convey, lease, rent, and
manage property, real and personal, for the benefit of the
school district in the name by which the district is
designated, either alone or jointly with another public or
private agency, institution, person, or corporation. This
includes leasing of real property under W.S. 21-15-112. Any
rental fees charged by the district for use of school
district property by youth clubs and activities not
sponsored by the district shall:
(A) Not exceed the hourly rate of
personnel, equipment, utility and supply costs actually
incurred by the district for the specific use of the
property during each rental period, limited to direct,
incremental costs that would not otherwise have been
incurred. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
require the district to charge any fee and the district may
permit use without charge;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0090
ENROLLED ACT NO. 36, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Upon request, be supported by an
itemized statement identifying the district's personnel,
equipment, supply and utility costs incurred for the
specific use of the property. The itemized statement shall
be provided not more than fifteen (15) days after a request
is made pursuant to this subparagraph; and
(C) Not require a youth club or activity
not sponsored by the school district to maintain formal
legal status as a nonprofit organization or any other
specific corporate status as a prerequisite for the use of
school property under this paragraph.
Section 2. This act shall not be construed to impair
any contract or agreement entered into before July 1, 2026.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0090
ENROLLED ACT NO. 36, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3